Utah statutes.
76-3-302.   Fines of corporations, associations, partnerships, or government
instrumentalities.
A corporation, association, partnership, or governmental instrumentality shall
pay a fine for an offense defined in this code for which no special corporate
fine is specified.  The fine shall not exceed:
(1)  $20,000 for a felony conviction;
(2)  $10,000 for a class A misdemeanor conviction;
(3)  $5,000 for a class B misdemeanor conviction; and
(4)  $1,000 for a class C misdemeanor conviction or for an infraction
conviction.
